Connecticut, session 2026, SB00021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars be appropriated
to the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection, from the
General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for disposal of
surface debris from the mouth of the Housatonic River in the town of
Stratford.